Wyoming statutes. Title 37 Public Utilities
Chapter 13 Local Improvement Districts

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

70C Am. Jur. 2d Special or Local Assessment § 1 et seq.

§ 37-13-101.
Short title.

This act [§§

37-13-101

through

37-13-137

] shall be known and cited as the “Wyoming Underground Conversion of Utilities Law”.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 247, § 1.

§ 37-13-102.
Legislative purpose.

The legislature finds that in many areas of the state, landowners, cities, towns, counties and public utilities desire to convert existing overhead electric and communication facilities to underground locations by means of improvement district proceedings. The legislature hereby declares that a public purpose will be served by providing a procedure to accomplish such conversion and that it is in the public interest to provide for such conversion by proceedings taken pursuant to this chapter [§§

37-13-101

through

37-13-137

] whether such areas be within the limits of a city or town or within a county.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 247, § 1.

§ 37-13-103.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter [§§

37-13-101

through

37-13-137

] the following words and phrases and any variations thereof shall have the following meaning:

“Communication service” means the transmission of intelligence by electrical means, including, but not limited to telephone, telegraph, messenger-call, clock, police, fire alarm and traffic control circuits or the transmission of standard television or radio signals;

“Electric service” means the distribution of electricity for heat, light or power;

“Convert” or “conversion” means the removal of all or any part of any existing overhead electric or communications facilities and the replacement thereof with underground electric or communication facilities constructed at the same or different locations;

“Electric or communication facilities” means any works or improvements used or useful in providing electric or communication service, including, but not limited to, poles, supports, tunnels, manholes, vaults, conduits, pipes, wires, conductors, guys, stubs, platforms, crossarms, braces, transformers, insulators, cutouts, switches, capacitors, protective devices, meters, communication circuits, appliances, attachments, and appurtenances. “Electric facilities” shall not include any facilities used or intended to be used for the transmission of electric energy at nominal voltages in excess of twenty-three thousand (23,000) volts. “Communication facilities” shall not include facilities used for the transmission of intelligence by microwave or radio, apparatus cabinets or outdoor public telephones;

“Overhead electric or communication facilities” means electric or communication facilities located, in whole or in part, above the surface of the ground;

“Underground electric or communication facilities” means electric or communication facilities located, in whole or in part, beneath the surface of the ground or facilities within the confines of a power substation. “Communication facilities” shall not include facilities used or intended to be used for the transmission of intelligence by microwave or radio or outdoor public telephones. “Underground facilities” shall include certain facilities which remain above the surface in accordance with standard underground practices, such as transformers, pull boxes, service terminals, meters, pedestal terminals, splice closures, apparatus cabinets and similar facilities;

“Public utility” means any one (1) or more public or private persons or corporations that provide electric or communication service to the public by means of electric or communication facilities and includes any city, county, special district, or public corporation that provides electric or communication service to the public by means of electric or communication facilities; and as used herein this definition shall include legal entities that are not otherwise classified as public utilities and the inclusion of such other entities herein shall not affect their status under any other law or laws;

“Governing body” means the board of commissioners or city council or board of trustees as may be appropriate depending on whether the improvement district is located in a county or within a city or town;

“Resolution” shall be construed to mean ordinance where the governing body properly acts by ordinance, and resolution where the governing body properly acts by resolution.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 247, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 37-13-104.
Powers conferred.

The governing body is authorized and empowered to create local improvement districts within its territorial limits to provide for the conversion of existing overhead electric and communication facilities to underground locations and the construction, reconstruction or relocation of any other electric or communication facilities which may be incidental thereto, pursuant to the provisions of this chapter [§§

37-13-101

through

37-13-137

].

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 247, § 1.

§ 37-13-105.
Basis of assessments.

Whenever any improvement authorized to be made by any governing body by the terms of this chapter [§§

37-13-101

through

37-13-137

] is ordered, the governing body shall apportion the cost and expenses thereof as in their judgment is fair and equitable in consideration of the benefits accruing to the lots and land included within the improvement district. Each lot or parcel of land shall be separately assessed for the cost and expenses in proportion to the number of square feet of such lot or parcel compared to the total number of square feet included in the improvement district, or assessed upon a frontage, zone or other equitable basis in accordance with the benefits accruing to the property by the improvements, as the same may be determined by the governing body. The entire cost of the improvement shall be assessed against the benefited property. If money for paying part of the costs is available from any other source, in which [that] event the money so available may be applied to reduce the assessment.

The cost and expenses to be assessed shall include:

The conversion costs as determined by W.S.

37-13-129

or as estimated by the public utility, whichever is less;

Engineering services;

Clerical services;

Advertising expenses;

Costs of inspection;

Costs of collecting assessments;

Interest upon bonds if issued;

Costs for legal services for preparing proceedings and advising in regard thereto; and

For any other necessary or reasonable expense related to the intent of this act [§§

37-13-101

through

37-13-137

] and determined by the governing body to be appropriate for the favorable execution of the improvement district.

Fee lands of public entities, such as the federal government, state of Wyoming, or any county, city or town, shall not be subject to assessment for the payment of any of the cost or expense of the improvement unless the public entity owning lands within the boundaries of the improvement district files its consent in writing with the governing body before the governing body adopts a resolution declaring its intent to create a local improvement district.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 247, § 1; 2007, ch. 215, § 1.

The 2007 amendment,

in (b)(i) substituted “W.S.

37-13-129

” for “section 37-301 of the statutes.”

Laws 2007, ch. 215, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 8, 2007.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2007, ch. 215, § 4, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

§ 37-13-106.
Resolution for cost and feasibility study.

Any governing body may upon a petition signed by at least sixty percent (60%) of the resident owners of property subject to assessment owning at least sixty percent (60%) of the assessable land of any proposed district, adopt a resolution at any regular or special meeting declaring that it finds that the improvement district is in the public interest. It must be determined that the formation of the local improvement district will promote the public convenience, necessity, and welfare. The resolution must state that the costs and expenses will be levied and assessed upon the property benefited and request that each public utility serving the proposed district by overhead electric or communication facilities shall, within one hundred twenty (120) days after receipt of the resolution, make a study of the cost of conversion of its facilities in the area to underground service. The results of the study shall be provided to the governing body and made available in its office to all owners of land within the proposed district. The resolution of the governing body shall require that the public utilities be provided with the name and address of the owner of each parcel or lot within the proposed district, if known, and if not known the description of the property and other matters as may be required by the public utility in order to perform the work involved in the cost study. Each public utility serving the proposed district by overhead electric or communication facilities shall, within one hundred twenty (120) days after receipt of the resolution, make a study of the costs of conversion of its facilities in the district to underground service, and shall together provide the governing body and make available at its office a joint report as to the results of the study.

At any time prior to the hearing provided for in W.S.

37-13-111

of the statutes, if requested by the governing body or public utility, a bond shall be filed, with security approved by the governing body or cash deposit made sufficient to pay all expenses of the governing body connected with the proceedings and of the public utilities for actual time and expenses incurred in regard to the cost and feasibility study in case the organization of the district is not effected. If at any time during the organization proceedings the governing body shall be satisfied that the bond first executed or the amount of cash deposited is insufficient in amount, it on its own initiative or at the request of a public utility may require the execution of an additional bond or the deposit of additional cash within a time to be fixed, not less than ten (10) days distant, and upon failure of the petitioners to file or deposit the same, the petition shall be dismissed.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 247, § 1; 2008, ch. 116, § 1.

The 2008 amendment,

substituted “W.S.

37-13-111

” for “section 37-282” in (b).

Laws 2008, ch. 116, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2008.

§ 37-13-107.
Costs and feasibility report.

The public utility or utilities report shall set forth an estimate of the total underground conversion costs for the district and shall also indicate the cost of underground conversion of facilities of the public utility located within the boundaries of the various parcels or lots within the district. The report shall also contain the public utility’s recommendations concerning the engineering feasibility of the project for the district proposed insofar as the physical characteristics of the district are concerned. The report shall make recommendations by the public utility concerning inclusion or exclusion of areas within the district or immediately adjacent to the district. The governing body shall consider the public utility’s recommendations concerning feasibility and may amend the boundaries of the proposed improvement district provided the costs and feasibility report of the public utilities contains a cost figure on the district as amended, or it may request a new costs and feasibility report from the public utilities concerned on the basis of the amended district. The cost estimate contained in the report shall not be considered binding on the public utility if construction is not commenced within six (6) months of the submission of the estimate for reasons not within the control of the public utility. Should such a delay result in a significant increase in the conversion cost, new hearings shall be held on the creation of the district. In the event that a ten percent (10%) or less increase results, only the hearing on the assessments need be held again.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 247, § 1.

§ 37-13-108.
Resolution declaring intention to create district.

On the filing with the clerk of any governing body of the cost and feasibility report by the public utility, and after considering the same, the governing body may, at any regular or special meeting, pass a resolution declaring its intention to create a local improvement district. The resolution shall state:

That the costs and expenses of the proposed district will be levied and assessed upon the abutting, adjoining, and adjacent lots and land along or upon which improvements are to be made, and upon lots and land benefited by the improvements and included in the improvement district created;

The contribution of the governing body, if any;

That it is the intention of the governing body to make the improvement which will promote public convenience, necessity and welfare;

The area and boundaries of the proposed improvement district;

The character of the proposed improvement;

The estimated total cost of the improvement; and

That the governing body will hold a hearing on the proposed improvements at which time it will consider protests filed with the governing body against the proposed improvements.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 247, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 37-13-109.
Notice of public hearing on proposed improvement; contents.

The governing body shall cause notice of a public hearing on the proposed improvement to be given in the manner provided in W.S.

37-13-110

. Such notice shall:

Declare that the governing body has passed a resolution of intention to create an improvement district;

Describe the boundaries or area of the district with sufficient particularity to permit each owner of real property therein to ascertain that his property lies in the district;

Describe in a general way the proposed improvement, specifying the streets or property along which it will be made and the nature of the benefits to the property within the district;

State the estimated cost to the property owners, governing body and public utility;

State that it is proposed to assess the real property in the district to pay as provided in W.S.

37-13-129

the cost of the improvement according to the proportionate square footage, front footage, or other equitable basis, as specified, based upon the benefits to be derived by each tract, lot or parcel of land within the district;

State the time and place at which the governing body will hear and pass upon all protests that may be made against the making of the improvement, the creation of the district, or the benefits to be derived by the real property in the district;

State that all interested persons will be heard and that any property owner will be heard on the question of whether his property will be benefited by the proposed improvement.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 247, § 1; 2007, ch. 215, § 1.

The 2007 amendment,

in (a) substituted “W.S.

37-13-110

” for “section 37-282 of the statutes”; in (a)(v) substituted “W.S.

37-13-129

” for “section 37-301 of the statutes.”

Laws 2007, ch. 215, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 8, 2007.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2007, ch. 215, § 4, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

§ 37-13-110.
Notice of public hearing on proposed improvement; manner of giving.

The notice shall be published in full one (1) time in a newspaper of general circulation in the county, city, or town in which the proposed district is located and by posting in not less than three (3) public places in the district. A copy of the notice shall be mailed to each owner of land within the proposed district whose property will be assessed for the cost of the improvement, at the address last appearing on the real property assessment rolls of the county wherein the property is located. In addition, a copy of the notice shall be addressed to “owner” and mailed to the street number of each piece of property to be affected by the assessment. Mailed notices and the published notice shall state where a copy of the resolution creating the district is available for inspection.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 247, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to publication of notices generally, see §§

1-6-201

to

1-6-204

.

§ 37-13-111.
Public hearing; changes in proposed improvements or in area of improvement district.

At the time and place specified in the notice, the governing body shall meet and proceed to hear and pass upon all objections and protests to the creation of the proposed district, the making of the proposed improvements, and the benefits accruing to any tract, lot or parcel of land therein. The hearing may be adjourned from time to time to a fixed future time and place. If at any time during the hearings, it appears to the governing body that changes in the proposed improvements or the proposed district should be made, which, after consultation with the public utilities concerned, appear to affect either the cost or feasibility of the improvements, the hearing shall be adjourned to a fixed future time and place and a new cost and feasibility report prepared on the basis of the contemplated changes.

If at any time during the public hearing the governing body is presented with a petition signed by more than fifty percent (50%) of the property owners of the proposed district protesting the proposed improvement and the petition is still outstanding at the close of the public hearing the district and project shall be abandoned.

After the hearing has been concluded and after all protests and objections have been considered, the governing body may make changes in the proposed improvements or in the area to be included in the district as it may consider necessary or desirable, provided the changes are not substantial. Notice and an opportunity to protest shall be given if substantial changes are desired by the governing body. The governing body shall either abandon the district and project or adopt a resolution establishing the district and authorizing the project, either as described in the notice or with changes made as above authorized. The resolution shall be published in the manner provided in W.S.

37-13-110

but need not be mailed.

If a resolution is adopted establishing the district, the resolution shall conclusively establish the regular organization of the district against all persons, unless an action contesting the validity of the organization is commenced in a court of competent jurisdiction within thirty (30) days after the adoption of the resolution. Thereafter, any action is barred and the organization of the district shall not be directly or collaterally questioned in any suit, action or proceeding.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 247, § 1; 2007, ch. 215, § 1.

The 2007 amendment,

in (c) substituted “W.S.

37-13-110

” for “section 37-282 of the statutes.”

Laws 2007, ch. 215, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 8, 2007.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2007, ch. 215, § 4, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

§ 37-13-112.
Waiver of objections.

Any person who has real property within the boundaries of the proposed district who fails to appear before the governing body at the hearing and make any objection he may have to the creation of the district, the making of the improvements and the inclusion of his real property in the district, shall be deemed to have waived every objection. However, the waiver shall not preclude his right to object to the amount of the assessment at the hearing provided for that purpose.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 247, § 1.

§ 37-13-113.
Proposed assessment list.

After the resolution creating the district is adopted, the governing body shall cause an assessment list to be prepared detailing the total cost to be assessed, the specific properties assessed, and the amount of assessment on each piece of property. The total cost of the improvement shall include the cost of construction as determined from the costs and feasibility report, legal and fiscal fees and costs, the cost of publication of notices and all other costs properly incident to the construction of the improvement and the financing thereof.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 247, § 1.

§ 37-13-114.
Proposed assessment resolution.

After the preparation of the proposed assessment list, the governing body shall cause to be prepared for adoption at the assessment hearing a resolution incorporating the proposed assessment list and declaring what share, if any, of the total cost is payable from voluntary contributions or governmental sources other than the imposition of assessments.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 247, § 1.

§ 37-13-115.
Board of equalization and review.

Before the governing body shall propose to levy any tax under any provision of this chapter [§§

37-13-101

through

37-13-137

], it shall sit as a board of equalization and review for the purpose of making corrections in the proposed assessments. After concluding the assessment hearings the governing body shall prepare a report of any changes or corrections made by it in the assessment list together with its finding that each piece of property within the improvement district will be benefited in amounts not less than the assessment to be levied against the property.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 247, § 1.

§ 37-13-116.
Notice of public hearing on proposed assessments.

Notice of a public hearing on the proposed assessment resolution shall be given. At least twenty (20) days before the date fixed for the hearing, the notice shall be published one (1) time in a newspaper in which the first notice of hearing was published. Notice shall also be mailed to each owner of real property whose property will be assessed for part of the cost of the improvement at the last known address of the owner as shown on the last completed real property assessment rolls of the county wherein the affected property is located. In addition, a copy of the notice shall be addressed and mailed to “owner” at the street number of each piece of property affected by the assessment. Each notice shall state that at the specified time and place the governing body will hold a hearing upon the proposed assessments and that the owner of any property to be assessed pursuant to the resolution will be heard on the question of whether his property will be benefited by the proposed improvement to the amount of the proposed assessment against his property and whether the amount assessed against his property constitutes more than his proper proportional share of the total cost of the improvement. The notice shall further state that the owner or owners of any property assessed must file a written objection pursuant to section 37-303 [§

37-13-131

] of the statutes if the owner or owners wish to do the trenching and backfilling on their own property outside of utility easements and thereby not be obligated to pay the public utility therefor, if such is permitted by the district and public utility tariff. The notice shall further state where a copy of the proposed resolution levying the assessments against all real property in the district is on file for public inspection, and that subject to such changes and corrections as may be made by the governing body, it is proposed to adopt the resolution at the conclusion of the hearing. The published notice shall describe the boundaries or area of the district with sufficient particularity to permit each owner of real property therein to ascertain that his property lies in the district. The mailed notice may refer to the district by name and date of creation and shall state the amount of the assessment proposed to be levied against the real property of the person to whom the notice is mailed. In the absence of fraud, the failure to mail any notice does not invalidate any assessment or any proceeding under this chapter.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 247, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to publication of notices generally, see §§

1-6-201

to

1-6-204

.

§ 37-13-117.
Public hearing on proposed assessment resolution; corrections.

At the time and place specified in the assessment hearing notice, the governing body shall hear all arguments relating to the benefits accruing to any tract, lot or parcel of land therein and the amounts proposed to be assessed against any tract, lot or parcel. The hearing may be adjourned from time to time to a fixed future time and place. After the hearing has been concluded and all persons desiring to be heard have been heard, the governing body shall consider the arguments presented and shall make the corrections in the assessment list as may be considered just and equitable. The corrections may eliminate, increase, or decrease the amount of the assessment proposed to be levied against any piece of property. However, no increase of any proposed assessment shall be valid unless the owner of the property is given notice and an opportunity to be heard.

After the corrections have been made, the governing body shall make a specific finding that no proposed assessment on the corrected assessment list exceeds the benefit to be derived from the improvement by the piece of property to be assessed and that no piece of property listed will bear more than its proper proportionate share of the cost of the improvement.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 247, § 1.

§ 37-13-118.
Adoption of the assessment resolution; civil action; statute of limitations.

After the public hearing has been concluded and all corrections made to the assessment list, the governing body shall proceed to adopt the assessment resolution. The resolution and supporting findings shall be conclusive against all persons unless an action contesting the validity of this law or the acts contemplated by this law shall be commenced in a court of competent jurisdiction within thirty (30) days after the adoption of the assessment ordinance. Thereafter, any such action shall be barred and the organization of the district, the assessment levied pursuant thereto, or any other act authorized by this statute shall not be directly or collaterally questioned in any suit, action, or proceeding. The statute of limitations provided herein shall be an additional limitation to and supplement any requirements of the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act [§§

16-3-101

through

16-3-115

] or any rules issued thereunder. If the contest is unsuccessful, the court may order the plaintiff to pay the costs thereof, and, in its discretion, may require a bond in a sufficient amount to cover the costs at the commencement of the action. The burden of proof to show that the special assessment or part thereof is invalid, inequitable or unjust shall rest upon the party who brings the suit.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 247, § 1.

§ 37-13-119.
Payment of assessment.

The amount of the assessment is due and collectible without demand within thirty (30) days after the final publication of the assessment resolution and if it is not paid within such time it shall commence to bear interest at a rate fixed by the governing body. The published resolution shall specify the date when interest will commence, the rate of interest, and the period of years over which installment payments may be made. If not paid within the thirty (30) days allowed, it will be conclusively presumed that the owner exercises the right to pay the amount due in equal annual installments bearing interest at the rate specified in the resolution and extending over the period of years not exceeding ten (10) specified in the resolution. The first installment shall become due one (1) year from the date when interest commenced and one (1) installment shall become due on the same day of the same month annually thereafter.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 247, § 1; 1981, ch. 143, § 1; 1982, ch. 28, § 1.

§ 37-13-120.
Failure to pay installments; sale of property; return of sale; certificate of sale.

The failure to pay any installment including interest when due shall cause all other installments and the interest thereon to become due and payable and the governing body shall, within thirty (30) days from the date of default, by general ordinance providing for the sale of the property, proceed against the property for the collection of the total amount due including interest plus five percent (5%) additional on unpaid principal and interest as penalties and costs of collection.

The governing body shall cause notice of sales for delinquent assessments and make the sales thereof in the same manner as is provided for sales of property by a treasurer of a city or town for delinquent assessments as provided in W.S.

15-6-410

.

The governing body shall make a return of sale in the same manner as is provided in W.S.

15-6-411

.

The governing body shall make out such a certificate and deliver the same as provided in W.S.

15-6-412

and said certificate and the lien thereof shall have the same validity and effect as provided therein.

The governing body shall be custodian of such certificates, may sell and transfer any such certificate and generally may act with the same powers and authority as provided in W.S. 15-6-412(b).

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 247, § 1; 2007, ch. 215, § 1.

The 2007 amendment,

in (b) substituted “W.S.

15-6-410

” for “section 15.1-354 of the statutes”; in (c) substituted “W.S

15-6-411

” for “section 15.1-355 of the statutes”; in (d) substituted “W.S

15-6-412

” for “section 15.1-356 of the statutes”; and in (e) substituted “W.S

15-6-412

(b)” for “section 15.1-356(b) of the statutes”

Laws 2007, ch. 215, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 8, 2007.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2007, ch. 215, § 4, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

§ 37-13-121.
Redemption of property sold for assessment; deed.

Any property sold for an assessment as provided in W.S.

37-13-120

shall be subject to redemption from the governing body and a redemption deed shall be executed after two (2) years from the date of the sale in the same manner as is provided for redemption in W.S.

15-6-418

.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 247, § 1; 2007, ch. 215, § 1.

The 2007 amendment

deleted “hereinabove” following “for an assessment as”, inserted “in W.S.

37-13-120

” and substituted “W.S.

15-6-418

” for “section 15.1-362 of the statutes.”

Laws 2007, ch. 215, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 8, 2007.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2007, ch. 215, § 4, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

§ 37-13-122.
Assessment lien.

Special assessments levied hereunder are equal with taxes levied against the property by the state, the county and all other taxing districts, and are superior to any other lien or encumbrance created before or after. No sale of property for the nonpayment of taxes or other special assessments shall extinguish any lien other than the taxes or special assessments for the nonpayment of which sale is had.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 247, § 1.

§ 37-13-123.
Proceeds of sale.

The proceeds of the sale of any property for nonpayment of special assessments shall be applied in the discharge of the assessments, the interest, costs and penalties thereon. If there are outstanding any special improvement bonds issued pursuant to the improvement in question, proceeds of the sale shall, after the payment therefrom of the costs of collection, be applied to the cost of redemption prior to maturity of as many of the outstanding special improvement bonds as can be retired with the amount available.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 247, § 1.

§ 37-13-124.
Property bid in by city, town or county to be held in trust; trust discharged by payment of assessment.

When any property is bid in by or stricken off to any city, town or county the property shall be held in trust by the city, town or county for the fund of the improvement district for which the assessment was levied to the extent of the unpaid assessment for which the property was sold, with penalty, and all accrued interest and interest owed in the future. However, the city, town or county may after receiving a deed pay the fund the amount of the delinquent assessment for which the property was sold, any penalties owed, and all accrued interest and interest to the time of the next call for bonds issued against the assessment fund at the rate provided, and thereupon take and hold the property discharged of the trust.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 247, § 1.

§ 37-13-125.
Sale of property held in trust; notice.

After the period of redemption has expired and a deed has been issued to a city, town or county, it may sell the property at public auction to the highest bidder for cash. No bid may be accepted for less than the amount set forth in the deed plus accrued interest to date of sale computed on the assessment for which the property was sold from the date of the execution of the deed and all delinquent assessments and taxes against the property with accrued interest, penalties, costs and other charges. The city, town or county shall pay into the fund for which the property was held in trust an amount necessary to fully discharge the assessment for which the property was sold, together with all interest and penalties.

Any sale shall be conducted only after notice has been given, describing the property and stating that the treasurer will on the day specified sell the property at the front door of the building in which the governing body holds its sessions, between the hours of 10:00 a.m. and 4:00 p.m. The notice shall be published at least five (5) times in a daily newspaper published within the district or if there is none, at least twice in a newspaper of general circulation in the district. The sale cannot be less than fifteen (15) days after the date of the last publication of the notice.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 247, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to publication of notices generally, see §§

1-6-201

to

1-6-204

.

§ 37-13-126.
Advance payment of assessment installations.

The governing body, in the resolution levying the assessments, may provide that all unpaid installment assessments levied against any property may be paid, but only in their entirety, prior to the dates on which they become due if the person paying the installments pays all interest which would accrue thereon to the next succeeding date on which interest is payable on the bonds issued in anticipation of the collection of the assessments. In addition, the person must pay the additional amount of interest as in the opinion of the governing body is necessary to assure the availability of money fully sufficient to pay interest on the bonds as interest becomes due, and any redemption premiums which may become payable on the bonds in order to retire, in advance of maturity, bonds in a sufficient amount to utilize the assessments thus paid in advance. If no bonds have been issued then all unpaid installments of assessments levied against any piece of property may be paid in their entirety prior to the date upon which they become due by paying the principal amount due and the interest accrued thereon to the date of payment.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 247, § 1.